West Virginia, session 2026, HB4475.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 37. disaster recovery acceleration act. §29-37-1. Restoration of private property by an individual following a natural disaster. (a) Short title. – This article may be referred to and referenced as the "Disaster Recovery Acceleration Act."(b) Definition. – "Disaster restoration" means the repair or restoration, or both, other than normal maintenance, or the replacement of, real property of an individual, that is damaged or destroyed by a disaster.(c) Conditions. – (1) An individual who undergoes disaster restoration is entitled to rebuild his or her new home up to 125% of the original square footage without triggering new development standards or extensive environmental reviews.(2) Existing home or building codes shall be followed by an individual undergoing disaster restoration to his or her property: Provided, That if an existing home was grandfathered into any existing rules or regulations of a city, municipality, or county, those shall continue to exist during a disaster restoration.